Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2501
Omitted.

Laws 2015, LB268, § 22;

Referendum 2016, No. 426.
Section 29-2501, newly enacted by Laws 2015, LB 268, section 22, and assigned by the Revisor of Statutes to section 29-2501, has been omitted because of the vote on the referendum at the November 2016 general election.